Wyoming, session 2026, SF0014.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. There is appropriated two hundred forty
thousand dollars ($240,000.00) from the public school
foundation program account to the department of education
to employ one (1) full-time employee position to assist
school districts in implementing a reading assessment and
intervention program and language and literacy programs as
required by Wyoming statutes for the period beginning July
1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028. Of this appropriation,
not more than one hundred twenty thousand dollars
($120,000.00) shall be expended each fiscal year. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028. It is the intent of the
legislature that the department of education include this
appropriation and the full-time position authorized by this
subsection in its standard budget request for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0014
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2